Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 61-501 to 61-520 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 1.